Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3515
Election commissioner or county clerk; conduct election; certify results.

(1)(a) At any election held to elect trustees of a community improvement district, the ballots shall be received, counted, and canvassed by an election board of two or more persons appointed by the election commissioner or county clerk.

(b) Such board shall select one of their number as chairperson and one of their number as clerk. In case of a vacancy on such board, a new member shall be appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of this subsection.

(2) For any community improvement district, the election commissioner or county clerk shall certify the results of the election to the community improvement district.

(3) If an election is contested involving a community improvement district board of trustees, the Election Act shall apply.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 15.
April 17, 2026
Election Act, see section 32-101.